Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF4351.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245.4661, subdivision 9, is amended to read: Subd. 9. Services and programs. (a) The following three distinct grant programs are funded under this section: (1) mental health crisis services; (2) housing with supports for adults with serious mental illness; and (3) projects for assistance in transitioning from homelessness (PATH program). (b) In addition, the following are eligible for grant funds: (1) community education and prevention; (2) client outreach; (3) early identification and intervention; (4) adult outpatient diagnostic assessment and psychological testing; (5) peer support services; (6) community support program services (CSP); (7) adult residential crisis stabilization; (8) supported employment; (9) assertive community treatment (ACT); (10) housing subsidies; (11) basic living, social skills, and community intervention; (12) emergency response services; (13) adult outpatient psychotherapy; (14) adult outpatient medication management; (15) adult mobile crisis services, including the purchase and renovation of vehicles by mobile crisis teams in order to provide protected transport under section 256B.0625, subdivision 17, paragraph (l), clause (6); (16) adult day treatment; (17) partial hospitalization; (18) adult residential treatment; (19) adult mental health targeted case management; deleted text begin anddeleted text end (20) transportationdeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ; andnew text end new text begin (21) culturally specific or culturally responsive adult mental health services. new text end Sec. 2. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 245.4889, subdivision 1, is amended to read: Subdivision 1. Establishment and authority. (a) The commissioner is authorized to make grants from available appropriations to assist: (1) counties; (2) Indian tribes; (3) children's collaboratives under section 142D.15 or 245.493; or (4) mental health service providers. (b) The following services are eligible for grants under this section: (1) services to children with mental illness as defined in section 245.4871, subdivision 15, and their families; (2) transition services under section 245.4875, subdivision 8, for young adults under age 21 and their families; (3) respite care services for children with mental illness or serious mental illness who are at risk of residential treatment or hospitalization; who are already in residential treatment or therapeutic foster care or in family foster settings as defined in chapter 142B and at risk of change in foster care or placement in a residential facility or other higher level of care; who have utilized crisis services or emergency room services; or who have experienced a loss of in-home staffing support. Allowable activities and expenses for respite care services are defined under subdivision 4. A child is not required to have case management services to receive respite care services. Counties must work to provide access to regularly scheduled respite care; (4) children's mental health crisis services; (5) child-, youth-, and family-specific mobile response and stabilization services models; (6) mental health services for people from cultural and ethnic minorities,new text begin and culturally specific or culturally responsive mental health services,new text end including supervision of clinical trainees who are Black, Indigenous, or people of color; (7) children's mental health screening and follow-up diagnostic assessment and treatment; (8) services to promote and develop the capacity of providers to use evidence-based practices in providing children's mental health services; (9) school-linked mental health services under section 245.4901; (10) building evidence-based mental health intervention capacity for children birth to age five; (11) suicide prevention and counseling services that use text messaging statewide; (12) mental health first aid training; (13) training for parents, collaborative partners, and mental health providers on the impact of adverse childhood experiences and trauma and development of an interactive website to share information and strategies to promote resilience and prevent trauma; (14) transition age services to develop or expand mental health treatment and supports for adolescents and young adults 26 years of age or younger; (15) early childhood mental health consultation; (16) evidence-based interventions for youth at risk of developing or experiencing a first episode of psychosis, and a public awareness campaign on the signs and symptoms of psychosis; (17) psychiatric consultation for primary care practitioners; (18) providers to begin operations and meet program requirements when establishing a new children's mental health program. These may be start-up grants; and (19) evidence-based interventions for youth and young adults at risk of developing or experiencing an early episode of bipolar disorder. (c) Services under paragraph (b) must be designed to help each child to function and remain with the child's family in the community and delivered consistent with the child's treatment plan. Transition services to eligible young adults under this paragraph must be designed to foster independent living in the community. (d) As a condition of receiving grant funds, a grantee shall obtain all available third-party reimbursement sources, if applicable. (e) The commissioner may establish and design a pilot program to expand the mobile response and stabilization services model for children, youth, and families. The commissioner may use grant funding to consult with a qualified expert entity to assist in the formulation of measurable outcomes and explore and position the state to submit a Medicaid state plan amendment to scale the model statewide. Sec. 3. new text begin APPROPRIATION; MOBILE CRISIS GRANTS.new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for adult mobile crisis services grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (15). For grants awarded under this section, the commissioner must give priority to counties, adult mental health initiatives, and Tribes in the geographic areas most impacted by the United States Department of Homeland Security Operation Metro Surge, as determined by the commissioner. Grantees must report to the commissioner on the use of money received under this section, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 4. new text begin APPROPRIATION; SCHOOL-LINKED BEHAVIORAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for school-linked behavioral health grants under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4901. For grants awarded under this section, the commissioner must give priority to grantees that will provide school-linked behavioral health services in school districts or individual schools that have experienced increased rates of student absences or increased enrollment in online instruction since December 2025 related to the United States Department of Homeland Security Operation Metro Surge. If requested by the commissioner of human services, the commissioner of education must share data on attendance rates with the commissioner of human services for purposes of determining priority for grant awards under this section. new text end new text begin (b) Grantees must report to the commissioner on the use of money received under this section, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (c) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 5. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURALLY SPECIFIC OR CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE ADULT MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to provide culturally specific or culturally responsive adult mental health treatment services under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4661, subdivision 9, paragraph (b), clause (21). For grants awarded under this section, the commissioner must give priority to grantees in the geographic areas most impacted by the United States Department of Homeland Security Operation Metro Surge, as determined by the commissioner. Grantees must have demonstrated experience addressing and treating adult mental health issues related to community-wide trauma, including but not limited to post-traumatic stress disorder. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, a provider of culturally specific or culturally responsive adult mental health treatment services must attest that the provider: new text end new text begin (1) improves service quality to and outcomes of a specific community that shares a common language or racial, ethnic, or social background by advancing health equity to help eliminate health disparities; new text end new text begin (2) is governed with significant input from individuals of the community or background specified in clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) ensures effective, equitable, comprehensive, and respectful quality services that are responsive to an individual within a specific community's values, beliefs and practices, health literacy, preferred language, and other communication needs; new text end new text begin (4) complies with national standards for culturally and linguistically appropriate services or other equivalent standards, as determined by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (5) employs individuals to provide mental health treatment services, at least 50 percent of whom are members of the specific community being served. new text end new text begin (c) Grantees must report to the commissioner on the use of money received under this section, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end Sec. 6. new text begin APPROPRIATION; CULTURALLY SPECIFIC OR CULTURALLY RESPONSIVE CHILDREN'S MENTAL HEALTH GRANTS.new text end new text begin (a) $....... in fiscal year 2027 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of human services for grants to provide culturally specific or culturally responsive children's mental health treatment services, under Minnesota Statutes, section 245.4889, subdivision 1, paragraph (b), clause (6). For grants awarded under this section, the commissioner must give priority to grantees in the geographic areas most impacted by the United States Department of Homeland Security Operation Metro Surge, as determined by the commissioner. Grantees must have demonstrated experience addressing and treating children's mental health related to community-wide trauma, including but not limited to post-traumatic stress disorder. new text end new text begin (b) For purposes of this section, a provider of culturally specific or culturally responsive children's mental health treatment services must attest that the provider: new text end new text begin (1) improves service quality to and outcomes of a specific community that shares a common language or racial, ethnic, or social background by advancing health equity to help eliminate health disparities; new text end new text begin (2) is governed with significant input from individuals of the community or background specified in clause (1); new text end new text begin (3) ensures effective, equitable, comprehensive, and respectful quality services that are responsive to an individual within a specific community's values, beliefs and practices, health literacy, preferred language, and other communication needs; new text end new text begin (4) complies with national standards for culturally and linguistically appropriate services or other equivalent standards, as determined by the commissioner; and new text end new text begin (5) employs individuals to provide mental health treatment services, at least 50 percent of whom are members of the specific community being served. new text end new text begin (c) Grantees must report to the commissioner on the use of money received under this section, in a form and manner prescribed by the commissioner. new text end new text begin (d) This is a onetime appropriation and is available until June 30, 2029. new text end